Virginia statutes. Title 45.2. Mines, Minerals, and Energy.
Article 4. Ventilation, Mine Gases, and Other Hazardous Conditions.

§ 45.2-826.
Pre-shift examinations.

The operator or his agent shall establish eight-hour intervals of time, each of which shall be subject to a required pre-shift examination. Within three hours preceding the beginning of any such eight-hour interval during which any person is scheduled to work or travel underground, a mine foreman shall make a pre-shift examination. No person scheduled to enter the mine during the eight-hour interval, other than the mine foreman who is conducting the examination, shall enter any underground area unless a pre-shift examination has been completed for such established eight-hour interval.

During the pre-shift examination, the mine foreman shall (i) examine for hazardous conditions, (ii) test for methane and oxygen deficiency with a suitable permissible device, and (iii) determine whether the air is traveling in its regular course and in sufficient volume in each split, at each of the following underground locations:

Every track entry or other area where persons are scheduled to work or travel during the oncoming shift;

Every belt conveyor that will be used to transport persons during the oncoming shift and the entry in which each such belt conveyor is located;

Any working section or area where mechanized mining equipment is being installed or removed if a person is scheduled to work on the section or in the area during the oncoming shift. Such a working section or area includes each working place and each approach to a worked-out area, and ventilation controls on each such section or in each such area;

Each approach to a worked-out area along an intake air course if intake air passes by such worked-out area to ventilate any working section where a person is scheduled to work during the oncoming shift;

Every seal along an intake air course where intake air passes by such seal to ventilate any working section where a person is scheduled to work during the oncoming shift;

Where intake air passes through or by an entry or room to any working section where a person is scheduled to work during the oncoming shift, each such entry or room that is driven (i) more than 20 feet off an intake air course without a crosscut or permanent ventilation controls or (ii) more than two crosscuts off an intake air course without permanent ventilation controls; and

Where unattended diesel equipment is expected to operate or an area in which trolley wires or trolley feeder wires are to be or will remain energized during the oncoming shift.

During the pre-shift examination, the mine foreman shall determine the volume of air entering each of the following areas if a miner is scheduled to work in such area during the oncoming shift:

In the last open crosscut of each set of entries or rooms on each working section or any area in which mechanized mining equipment is being installed or removed;

On each longwall or shortwall in each intake entry at the intake end of the longwall or shortwall face immediately outby the face. The mine foreman shall also determine the velocity of air at each end of the face at the locations specified in the approved ventilation plan required by the federal mine safety law; and

At the intake end of any pillar line (i) in the intake entry furthest from the return air course, immediately outby the first open crosscut outby the line of pillars being mined, if a single split of air is used or (ii) in the intake entries of each split, immediately inby the split point, if a split system is used.

A mine foreman shall make a pre-shift examination of the surface areas of an underground coal mine in accordance with the requirements for pre-shift examinations at surface coal mines as provided in §

45.2-903

.

The Chief may require the mine foreman to examine other areas of the mine or to examine for other hazards during the pre-shift examination.

Any area of the mine where hazardous conditions are found shall be posted with a conspicuous danger sign located where anyone entering the area would pass. Only a person designated by the operator or his agent to correct or evaluate the condition shall enter such posted area.

At each working place examined, the mine foreman shall certify by initials, date, and time that the examination was made. In any area to be examined outby a working section, the mine foreman shall certify completion of the examination by initials, date, and time at enough locations to show that the entire area has been examined.

Each idle or worked-out area underground shall be inspected for gas and other hazardous conditions by a mine foreman immediately before miners are permitted to enter or work in such place. A certified person shall supervise the correction of any condition that creates an imminent danger. The mine operator or his agent shall not pass beyond the danger sign except in cases of necessity.

If no person has been working underground before an established eight-hour interval, no person other than a mine foreman conducting a pre-shift examination shall enter the mine until the examination has been completed and the mine foreman reports that the mine is clear of danger; however, miners may enter under the direction of a mine foreman for the purpose of making the mine safe. The Chief may, in certain mines, authorize mantrips to proceed to a designated station underground, from which no mantrip shall leave until a mine foreman reports that the remainder of the areas of the mine are clear of danger.

Miners who are regularly employed on a shift during which a pre-shift examination is being conducted shall be permitted to leave or enter the mine in the performance of their duties.

In a multiple-shift operation, certified persons may be used to make the pre-shift examination for the next or succeeding shift.

Immediately before any miner is permitted to enter an area of an inactive underground coal mine in order to take emergency actions to preserve the mine, a mine foreman shall examine such area for gas and other hazardous conditions.

In the performance of his duties under this section, the mine foreman shall have no superior officer, and every miner shall be subordinate to him.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 45-32, 45-33, 45-60.4, 45-68.1, 45-69.7; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, §§ 45.1-20, 45.1-65; 1978, c. 120; 1982, c. 385; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.208; 1996, c. 774; 2005, c. 3; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 4 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 10, 2005].”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-827.
On-shift examinations.

At least once during each shift, and more often if necessary, a certified person shall examine each underground section where coal is produced and any other area where mechanized mining equipment is being installed or removed during the shift. The certified person shall (i) examine for hazardous conditions, (ii) test for methane and oxygen deficiency with a suitable permissible device, and (iii) determine whether the air is traveling in its regular course and in sufficient volume in each split. Any hazardous condition shall be corrected immediately or the miners shall be withdrawn and the affected area plainly marked with danger signs.

During each shift in which coal is produced, a certified person shall examine for hazardous conditions along each underground belt conveyor entry where a belt conveyor is operated. Such examination may be conducted at the same time as the pre-shift examination of the belt conveyors and the belt conveyor entries, if the examination is conducted within three hours before the established eight-hour interval. The person conducting the examination shall certify by initials, date, and time at enough locations to show that the entire area has been examined.

A person conducting an on-shift examination shall determine at the following underground locations:

The volume of air in the last open crosscut of each set of entries or rooms on each working section and in any area in which mechanized mining equipment is being installed or removed;

The volume of air on a longwall or shortwall, including any area where longwall or shortwall equipment is being installed or removed, in the intake entry or entries at the intake end of the longwall or shortwall;

The velocity of air at each end of the longwall or shortwall face at each location specified in the approved ventilation plan required pursuant to the federal mine safety law; and

The volume of air at the intake end of any pillar line (i) in the intake entry furthest from the return air course, immediately outby the first open crosscut outby the line of pillars being mined, if a single split of air is used or (ii) in the intake entries of each split, immediately inby the split point, if a split system is used.

A test shall be made for methane before (i) any electrically powered equipment is taken inby the last open crosscut, (ii) any blasting takes place, and (iii) work is resumed after blasting. When a longwall or shortwall mining system is used, such methane test shall be made from under permanent roof support at the shearer, the plow, or the cutting head. Such methane test shall be made at least once every 20 minutes or more often as necessary for safety while such equipment is in operation. When mining has been stopped for more than 20 minutes, a methane test shall be conducted prior to the start-up of equipment.

Each idle or worked-out area underground, including any section belt that has been idle for a period of 24 hours or more, shall be examined by a certified person immediately before miners are permitted to enter or work in such area. The person conducting the examination shall certify completion of the examination by initials, date, and time at enough locations to show that the entire area has been examined.

Daily and on-shift examinations of surface areas of underground coal mines shall be made in accordance with the requirements for daily and on-shift examinations at surface coal mines as provided in §

45.2-903

.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 45-32, 45-33, 45-60.4, 45-60.5, 45-68.1, 45-69.7, 45-83; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, §§ 45.1-20, 45.1-62, 45.1-65, 45.1-83; 1978, c. 120; 1982, c. 385; 1993, c. 442; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.209; 1996, c. 774; 1999, c. 256; 2005, c. 3; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-828.
Weekly examinations.

At least once every seven days, a mine foreman shall examine each unsealed worked-out area where no pillars have been recovered.

At least once every seven days, a mine foreman shall evaluate the effectiveness of each bleeder system used pursuant to §

45.2-837

.

At least once every seven days, a mine foreman shall examine each of the following locations for hazardous conditions:

At least one entry of each intake air course, in its entirety, so that the entire air course is traveled.

At least one entry of each return air course, in its entirety, so that the entire air course is traveled.

Each longwall or shortwall travel way, in its entirety, so that the entire travel way is traveled.

Each seal along each return or bleeder air course and each seal along each intake air course not examined pursuant to §

45.2-826

.

Each escapeway, in its entirety, so that the entire escapeway is traveled.

Each working section not examined pursuant to §

45.2-826

during the previous seven days.

At least once every seven days, a certified person shall:

Determine the volume of air entering each main intake and each intake split;

Determine the volume of air and test for methane in the last open crosscut in any pair or set of developing entries or rooms. Such determination and test shall be conducted in the return of each split of air immediately before it enters the main returns and where the air leaves the main returns; and

Test for methane in the return entry nearest each set of seals immediately after the air passes the seals.

Any hazardous condition shall be corrected immediately. If the condition creates an imminent danger, everyone except those persons necessary to correct the hazardous condition shall be withdrawn from the area affected to a safe area until the hazardous condition is corrected.

No weekly examination is required during any seven-day period in which no person enters any underground area of a mine. If a mine is idled or is in a nonproducing status with entry only for maintenance of the mine, weekly examinations may be conducted in accordance with a plan approved by the Chief.

Except for certified persons required to make examinations, no person shall enter any underground area of a coal mine if no weekly examination has been completed within the preceding seven days. The weekly examination may be conducted at the same time as the pre-shift examination.

A person making a weekly examination shall certify completion of the examination by initials, date, and time at enough locations to show that the entire area has been examined.

Any examination of surface areas of underground coal mines shall be made in accordance with the requirements for weekly examinations at surface coal mines pursuant to §

45.2-903

.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 45-32, 45-33, 45-35, 45-40, 45-60.4, 45-68.1, 45-69.7; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, §§ 45.1-17, 45.1-56, 45.1-65; 1968, c. 310; 1978, cc. 120, 729; 1993, cc. 170, 442; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.210; 1996, c. 774; 1999, c. 256; 2005, c. 3; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 4 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 10, 2005].”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-829.
Examinations of fans.

An authorized person shall conduct a daily inspection of each main fan and of the machinery connected with such fan. The person making the examination shall record such examination in a book prescribed for this purpose or by other adequate means provided to permanently record the performance of the main fan and to give warning of an interruption to a fan. No such daily examination is required on any day in which no person goes underground, except that the examination shall be completed prior to any person entering the mine if no examination was made on the previous day.

Any place ventilated by means of a blower fan shall be examined for methane by a certified person before the fan is started at the beginning of the shift and after any interruption of fan operation that lasts for five minutes or more during the shift.

Each blower fan and its tubing shall be inspected at least twice during each working shift by a certified person.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 45-60.1, 45-60.2; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, §§ 45.1-54, 45.1-55; 1978, c. 120; 1988, c. 597; 1993, c. 442; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.211; 1999, c. 256; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-830.
Record of examinations.

Any hazardous condition found by the mine foreman or another certified person designated by the operator for the purpose of conducting examinations under this article shall be (i) corrected immediately or (ii) posted with conspicuous danger signs until the condition is corrected. If the hazardous condition creates an imminent danger, all persons except those required to perform work to correct the imminent danger shall be withdrawn from the affected area. The hazardous condition and the corrective actions taken shall be recorded in a book maintained for such purpose on the surface at the mine. The record shall be made by the completion of the shift on which the hazardous condition is found.

Upon completing the pre-shift examination, the mine foreman shall return to the surface or a designated station underground and report in person to an authorized person before any other miner enters the mine. Immediately upon reaching the surface, the mine foreman shall record in ink or indelible pencil the result of his inspection in a book maintained for such purpose on the surface at the mine.

At the completion of any shift during which a portion of a weekly examination is made, a record of each hazardous condition, its location, the corrective action taken, and the result and location of each air and methane measurement shall be made. Such record shall be made by the mine foreman making the examination or another certified person designated by the operator. If the record is made by a person other than the one making the examination, the person making the examination shall verify the record by initials and date.

The actual level of methane detected in any examination shall be recorded in the book.

A mine foreman or other certified person conducting a required examination shall record the results of his examination in ink or indelible pencil in a book maintained for such purpose on the surface at the mine. Similar records may be kept at designated stations or offices underground.

Records shall be countersigned by the supervisor of the examiner creating the records. Where such records disclose a hazardous condition, the countersigning of the records shall be performed no later than the end of the next regularly scheduled working shift following the shift for which the examination records were completed, and the person countersigning shall ensure that actions to eliminate or control each hazardous condition have been taken. Where such records disclose no hazardous condition, the countersigning may be completed within 24 hours following the end of the shift for which the examination records were completed. The operator may authorize another person who possesses authority equivalent to that of the supervisor to act in the supervisor’s temporary absence to read and countersign the records and ensure that action is taken to eliminate each hazardous condition disclosed in the records.

All records of examination shall be open for inspection by interested persons and maintained at the mine site for a minimum of one year.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 45-32, 45-33, 45-60.4, 45-68.1, 45-69.7; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-65; 1978, c. 120; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.212; 2005, c. 3; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 4 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 10, 2005].”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-831.
Notice of hazardous conditions.

The mine foreman shall give prompt attention to the removal of each hazardous condition reported to him by any person working in the mine. If it is impracticable to remove a hazardous condition at once, the mine foreman shall notify every person whose safety is threatened by such hazardous condition to remain away from the portion of the mine where the hazardous condition exists.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 45-35, 45-40; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-17; 1978, c. 729; 1993, c. 170; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.214; 1996, c. 774; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-832.
Notice of monitor tampering prohibition.

The operator or agent shall display, in bold-faced type, on a sign placed at the mine office, at the bath house, and on a bulletin board at the mine site, the following notice:

NOTICE: IT IS UNLAWFUL TO DISTURB, DISCONNECT, BYPASS, IMPAIR, OR OTHERWISE TAMPER WITH METHANE MONITORS OR OTHER DEVICES CAPABLE OF DETECTING THE PRESENCE OF EXPLOSIVE GASES IN AN UNDERGROUND COAL MINE. A VIOLATION IS PUNISHABLE AS A CLASS 6 FELONY.

History.

1993, c. 247, § 45.1-65.2; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.215; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 6 felonies, see §

18.2-10

.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-833.
Main fans.

The active workings of a mine shall be ventilated by means of main fans.

Unless otherwise approved by the Chief, each fan shall be (i) provided with pressure-recording gauges, (ii) installed on the surface in a fireproof housing, and (iii) equipped with fireproof air ducts.

In addition to the requirements of subsection B, each main fan shall either:

Be equipped with ample means of pressure relief and be offset not less than 15 feet from the nearest side of the mine opening; or

Be directly in front of, or over, the mine opening; however, such opening shall not be in direct line with forces coming out of the mine if an explosion were to occur. There shall be another opening, equipped with a weak-wall stopping or with explosion doors, that is located not less than 15 feet or more than 100 feet from the fan opening and in direct line with the forces coming out of the mine if an explosion were to occur; and

In a mine ventilated by multiple main mine fans, incombustible doors shall be installed so that if any main mine fan stops and air reversals through the fan are possible, the doors on the affected fan automatically close.

Each main mine fan shall be provided with an automatic device to give alarm when the fan slows down or stops. Unless otherwise approved by the Chief, such device shall be placed so that it will be seen or heard by an authorized person.

Each main fan shall be on a separate power circuit, independent of the mine circuit.

The area surrounding a main fan installation shall be kept free of combustible material for at least 100 feet in every direction where physical conditions permit.

Each mine fan shall be operated continuously except when no miner is underground and such mine fan is intentionally stopped for necessary testing, adjustment, maintenance, or repairs, or as otherwise approved by the Chief. If the main fan is intentionally stopped for testing, adjustment, maintenance, or repairs, the mine operator shall comply with the requirements set forth in the approved fan stoppage plan for that mine. If the main fan is stopped after all miners are out of the mine, the fan shall be operated for a period specified in the approved fan stoppage plan for that mine, prepared pursuant to §

45.2-834

, before any miner is allowed underground.

Where electric power is available, no main mine fan shall be powered by means of an internal combustion engine. However, if electric power is not available or the fan is employed for emergency use, a main mine fan may be powered with an internal combustion engine. Unless otherwise approved by the Chief, such fan shall be operated exhausting and the engine operating such fan shall be offset at least 10 feet from the fan and housed in a separate fireproof structure.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-60.1; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-54; 1978, c. 120; 1988, c. 597; 1993, c. 442; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.216; 1996, c. 774; 2005, c. 3; 2011, cc. 826, 862; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 4 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 10, 2005].”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-834.
Fan stoppage plan.

A fan stoppage plan shall be prepared for each mine. Such plan shall be subject to approval by the Chief or his designated representative. Failure to comply with any requirement set forth in the approved plan is a violation of this section. Each fan stoppage plan shall require the following:

When the main fan fails or stops, the power shall be cut off from the mine and miners shall be withdrawn from all face areas.

Miners shall be withdrawn from the underground areas if the ventilation is not restored within a reasonable time determined by the Chief, not to exceed 15 minutes. In determining such reasonable time period, the Chief shall consider, among other factors, the size and number of fans and the methane liberation rate of the mine.

If ventilation is restored within the time period established in the plan, each face area and any other area in which methane is likely to accumulate shall be examined by a certified person, and if all areas are found to be free of explosive or harmful gases, power may be restored and work resumed.

If ventilation is not restored within the time period established in the plan and the miners are evacuated from the mine, the main fan shall be operated for a period of time specified in the plan. Such period of time shall not be less than 15 minutes. Thereafter, the mine shall be examined by a certified person before any miner is permitted underground or any power circuit is energized.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-60.1; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-54; 1978, c. 120; 1988, c. 597; 1993, c. 442; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.217; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-835.
Auxiliary fans.

The installation or use of an auxiliary fan in any mine is prohibited without the prior written approval of the Chief.

A machine-mounted scrubber and spray fan system may be used for control of coal dust and enhancement of ventilation. Such an installation is not considered an auxiliary fan.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-60.2; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-55; 1993, c. 442; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.218; 2005, c. 3; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 4 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 10, 2005].”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-836.
Quantity of air.

The quantity of air passing through the last open crosscut shall be at least 9,000 cubic feet per minute. However, the quantity of air reaching the last open crosscut in a pillar-recovery section may be less than 9,000 cubic feet per minute if at least 9,000 cubic feet of air per minute is being delivered to the intake end of the pillar line.

The air current at a working face shall, under all conditions, have a sufficient volume and velocity to readily dilute and carry away smoke from blasting and any flammable or harmful gases and dust.

In a longwall or shortwall mining system:

The quantity of air shall be at least 30,000 cubic feet per minute reaching the working face, unless otherwise approved by the Chief; and

The velocity of air provided to control dust at designated locations on the longwall or shortwall face shall be maintained in accordance with the provisions of the mine ventilation plan approved by MSHA.

Ventilation shall be maintained during the installation or removal of mechanized mining equipment.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 45-4.1, 45-9, 45-12, 45-60.4, 45-74; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, §§ 45.1-5, 45.1-56; 1968, c. 310; 1976, c. 598; 1978, c. 120; 1984, c. 236; 1985, c. 448; 1987, c. 470; 1990, c. 963; 1993, c. 442; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.219; 1996, c. 774; 2005, c. 3; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 4 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 10, 2005].”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”

§ 45.2-837.
Bleeder systems.

Every mine shall have a system, approved by the Chief, of bleeder openings of air courses designed to provide positive movement of air through or around worked-out areas. Such system shall be sufficient to prevent a hazardous accumulation of gas in any such area and to minimize the effect of variations in atmospheric pressure. Each operator shall submit a bleeder system plan that complies with requirements developed by the Chief.

The system requirements developed by the Chief shall, at a minimum, address standards for (i) supplemental roof supports, (ii) water accumulation, (iii) continuous movement of gases from gob areas, (iv) methane content, (v) the use and operation of degasification systems, (vi) air flow direction and content, and (vii) ventilation controls. The Chief shall not approve a plan that provides for a methane content exceeding 4.5 percent in bleeder air courses.

This section shall not prohibit the sealing of worked-out areas in accordance with §

45.2-845

. The mine map requirements of §

45.2-542

may be used to depict bleeder system standards specified in this section.

Failure to comply with an approved plan is a violation of this section.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-60.4; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-56; 1968, c. 310; 1978, c. 120; 1993, c. 442; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.220; 1996, c. 774; 1999, c. 256; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-838.
Coursing of air.

The main intake and return air currents of a drift or slope mine shall not be in a single partitioned opening.

Every entry driven in coal shall be in a set of two or more entries.

Every transformer station, battery-charging station, substation, rectifier, and water pump shall be housed in an incombustible structure or area or be equipped with an approved fire suppression system. Each such installation shall be ventilated with intake air that is coursed into a return air course or to the surface and that is not used to ventilate any working place. This requirement does not apply to any (i) rectifier, battery-charging station, or power center with transformers that are of the dry type or contain nonflammable liquid, if such rectifier, battery-charging station, or power center is located at or near the working section and is moved as the working section advances or retreats; (ii) submersible pump; (iii) permissible pump and associated permissible switch gear; (iv) pump located at or near the working section that is moved as the working section advances or retreats; or (v) small portable pump. Such equipment shall be installed and operated only in a well-ventilated location.

Any change in ventilation that materially affects the main air current or any split thereof shall be made when the mine is not in operation and there are no miners in the mine other than those engaged in changing the ventilation.

Each section in a mine shall be ventilated by a separate split of air.

Air used to ventilate a belt haulage entry shall not be used to ventilate any working place unless approved by the Chief.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 45-60.4, 45-71; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-57; 1978, c. 120; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.221; 1996, c. 774; 1999, c. 256; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-839.
Actions for excessive methane.

Tests for methane concentration under this section shall be made by certified or qualified persons trained in the use of an approved detecting device that is properly maintained and calibrated. Tests shall be made at least one foot from the roof, face, ribs, and floor.

If a methane concentration of one percent or more is present in a working place; an intake air course, including an air course in which a belt conveyor is located; or an area where mining equipment is being installed or removed, work shall cease and electrically powered equipment shall be de-energized in the affected working place, except for any intrinsically safe atmospheric monitoring system (AMS), which need not be de-energized. Changes or adjustments shall be made to such ventilation system to reduce the methane concentration to below one percent. Only work to reduce the methane concentration to below one percent is permitted. Such limitation does not apply to any other face in the entry or slope in which work can be safely continued.

If a methane concentration of 1.5 percent or more is present in a working place; an intake air course, including an air course in which a belt conveyor is located; or an area where mining equipment is being installed or removed, only work necessary to reduce the methane concentration to less than 1.5 percent is permitted, and all miners except those required to perform such necessary work shall be withdrawn from the affected area. Electrically powered equipment in the affected area shall be de-energized and other mechanized equipment in the affected area shall be shut off, except for any intrinsically safe AMS.

If a methane concentration of one percent or more is present in a return or split between the last working place on a working section and the location at which such split of air meets another split of air, or the location at which such split is used to ventilate a seal or worked-out area, changes or adjustments shall be made to the ventilation system to reduce the methane concentration in the return air to less than one percent.

If a methane concentration of 1.5 percent or more is present in a return air split between the last working place on a working section and the location at which such split of air meets another split of air, or the location at which such split is used to ventilate a seal or worked-out area, all miners except those required to perform necessary work to correct the problem shall be withdrawn from the affected area. Other than an intrinsically safe AMS, all equipment in the affected area shall be de-energized at the source. No other work is permitted in the affected area until the methane concentration in the return air is less than one percent.

An alternative methane concentration of as much as 1.5 percent is allowed in a return air split if the following conditions are met: (i) the quantity of air in the split ventilating the active workings is at least 27,000 cubic feet per minute in the last open crosscut; (ii) the methane concentration in the split is continuously monitored during mining operations by an intrinsically safe AMS that gives a visual and audible signal on the working section when the methane concentration in the return air reaches 1.5 percent; and (iii) rock dust is continuously applied with a mechanical duster to the return air course during coal production at a location in the air course that is immediately outby the most inby monitoring point or inby such point if the mechanical duster is maintained in a permissible condition and does not adversely affect the AMS. If a methane concentration of 1.5 percent or more is present at the location at which a return air alternative is applied, all persons shall be withdrawn, except those necessary to improve ventilation, and changes or adjustments shall be made to reduce the methane concentration in the return air to below 1.5 percent as set forth in subsection E.

The methane concentration in a bleeder split of air immediately before the air in such split joins another split of air, or in a return air course other than described in subsections D and E, shall not exceed two percent.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-60.3; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-58; 1978, c. 120; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.222; 1996, c. 774; 1999, c. 256; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-840.
Crosscuts.

Crosscuts shall be made between entries and between rooms as provided in the approved roof control plan.

Every crosscut between an intake and a return air course shall be closed, except the one nearest the face. A crosscut between rooms shall be closed where necessary to provide adequate ventilation at the working face.

Where practicable, a crosscut shall be provided at or near the face of each entry or room before the place is abandoned.

No entry or room shall be started off an entry beyond the last open crosscut.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-60.4; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-59; 1978, c. 729; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.223; 1996, c. 774; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-841.
Permanent stoppings.

Permanent stoppings shall be built and maintained:

Between each intake and return air course, except that temporary controls may be used in any room that is located 600 feet or less from the centerline of the entry from which the room was developed. Unless otherwise approved by the Chief, such stoppings shall be maintained to and inclusive of the third connecting crosscut outby the working face.

To separate each belt conveyor haulage entry from any return air course, except where a belt entry is used as a return air course.

To separate the primary escapeway from any belt or trolley haulage entry, unless otherwise approved by the Chief.

In each return air course to direct air into adjacent worked-out areas.

Permanent stoppings shall be built of substantial, incombustible material such as concrete, concrete block, brick, tile, or other approved material; however, where physical conditions prohibit the use of such materials, timbers laid longitudinally “skin to skin” may be used.

The use of an air lock in the permanent intake stopping line near the section loading point is permitted to access the belt and transport supplies.

Stoppings shall be maintained to serve the purpose for which they were built and shall be reasonably airtight.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-60.4; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-59; 1978, c. 729; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.224; 1996, c. 774; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Effective date.

This section is effective October 1, 2021.

§ 45.2-842.
Ventilation controls.

Ventilation shall be so arranged by means of air locks, overcasts, or undercasts that the passage of a haulage trip or person along the entries will cause no interruption of the air current. Each air lock shall be ventilated sufficiently to prevent an accumulation of methane therein.

Air lock doors that are used in lieu of permanent stoppings or to control ventilation within an air course shall be (i) made of incombustible material or coated on all accessible surfaces with flame-retardant material having a flame spread index of 25 or less as tested under ASTM E162 and (ii) of sufficient strength to serve their intended purpose of maintaining separation and permitting travel between or within air courses or entries.

To provide easy access between the return, belt, and intake escapeway entries, substantially constructed man-doors that are properly marked so as to be readily detected shall be installed in at least every fifth crosscut in the stopping line separating such entries.

Doors shall be kept closed except when a miner or piece of equipment is passing through the doorway. Any motor crew or other miner who opens such doors shall see that they are closed before leaving them.

Overcasts, undercasts, and regulators shall be well-constructed; of incombustible material, such as masonry, concrete, concrete block, or prefabricated metal; and (i) of sufficient strength to withstand possible falls from the roof, (ii) of ample area to pass the required quantity of air, and (iii) kept clear of obstructions.

History.

Code 1950, § 45-60.4; 1954, c. 191; 1966, c. 594, § 45.1-60; 1993, c. 442; 1994, c. 28, § 45.1-161.225; 1996, c. 774; 2005, c. 3; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 3, cl. 4 provides: “That an emergency exists and this act is in force from its passage [February 10, 2005].”

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 387, cl. 13 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2021.”